Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-127 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A registered candidate or voter, as defined by subsection D
of this section, upon the refusal, failure, or neglect of a proper
officer of the state, county, city, district, or political
subdivision thereof to institute or diligently prosecute proper
Req. No. 12308 Page 1

proc eedings for the enforcement of state election laws, may in the
name of the State of Oklahoma as plaintiff, after serving a written
demand as described in subsection B of this section to the proper
officer, institute and maintain any proper action that the proper
officer might institute and maintain for the enforcement of civil
fines or punishments or other declaratory, equitable, or injunctive
relief.
B. Civil actions filed by a registered candidate or voter for
the enforcement of state election laws can only be brought if the
written demand upon the proper officer is made by the registered
candidate or voter within one (1) year of the discovery of evidence
that a violation of state election laws has been committed, and the
civil suit is filed within six (6) months following the refusal,
failure, or neglect of the proper officer to act upon the written
demand.
C. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines the claims
to be meritorious, any fines or other compensation awarded shall be
paid to the State of Oklahoma with thirty percent (30%) of any such
award paid in compensation to the registered candidate or voter
instituting the action. Upon entry of a judgment in favor of the
plaintiff, the registered candidate or voter shall be entitled to
recover reasonable attorney fees and court costs incurred in the
prosecution of the action.

Req. No. 12308 Page 2

D. The term "registered candidate or voter" shall mean a
registered candidate or voter of the State of Oklahoma or such
county, city, district, or political subdivision thereof who is
affected by a violation of state election laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025

60-1-12308 MJ 01/30/25

















Req. No. 12308 Page 3